el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ > Επιγονατίδες & προστατευτικά ποδιών χόκεϊ: Επιγονατίδες τερματοφύλακα χόκεϊ; Προστατευτικά ποδιών τερματοφύλακα χόκεϊ; Επικαλαμίδες παικτών χόκεϊ; Επενδύσεις και μανίκια για επικαλαμίδες
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Skyddsutrustning för hockey > Smalbens- och benskydd för hockey: Målvaktsknäskydd för ishockey; Målvaktsbenskydd för ishockey; Benskydd för utespelare i ishockey; Foder och strumpor för benskydd
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Jääkiekkosuojat > Jääkiekon säärisuojat ja patjat: Jääkiekkomaalivahdin polvisuojat; Jääkiekkomaalivahdin patjat; Jääkiekkoilijan säärisuojat; Säärisuojien pehmusteet ja hihat
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hockey-beskyttelsesudstyr > Benskinner og benbeskyttere til ishockey: Knæbeskyttere til hockeymålmænd; Benbeskyttere til hockeymålmænd; Benskinner til hockeyspillere; Foringer og sleeves til benskinner
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Echipamente de protecție pentru hochei > Protecții pentru tibie și paduri pentru picioare pentru hochei: Genunchiere pentru portarul de hochei; Jambiere de portar pentru hochei; Apărători de tibie pentru hochei; Căptușeli și mâneci pentru apărători de tibie
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Защитна екипировка за хокей > Предпазители за пищяла и подплънки за крака за хокей: Наколенки за хокейни вратари; Подплънки за крака на хокейни вратари; Протектори за пищяли за хокеисти; Подплънки и ръкави за пищяли
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Zaštitna oprema za hokej > Hokejaški štitnici za potkoljenice i noge: Štitnici za koljeno za vratare hokeja; Štitnici za noge za vratara za hokej; Štitnici za potkoljenicu za igrače hokeja; Podstave i štitnici za potkoljenicu
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 하키 보호 장비 > 하키 정강이 보호대/다리 보호대: 하키 골리 무릎 보호대; 하키 골리 레그 패드; 하키 플레이어 정강이 보호대; 정강이 보호대 라이너 및 슬리브
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Equipamento de proteção para hóquei > Proteções de pernas e caneleiras para hóquei: Joelheiras de guarda-redes de hóquei; Caneleiras de guarda-redes de hóquei; Caneleiras de jogador de hóquei; Forros e mangas para caneleiras
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Équipement de protection de hockey > Protège-tibias et jambières de hockey: Genouillères de gardien de but de hockey; Jambières de gardien de but de hockey; Protège-tibias de joueur de hockey; Doublures et manchons de protège-tibias
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイスホッケー用プロテクター > アイスホッケー用レガース・レッグパッド: ホッケーゴーリー用ニーガード; ホッケーゴーリー用レッグパッド; ホッケープレイヤー用シンガード; シンガードライナー・スリーブ
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Hokejové chrániče > Hokejové chrániče holení a nohou: Brankářské hokejové chrániče kolen; Brankářské hokejové betony; Hráčské hokejové chrániče holení; Vložky a návleky do chráničů holení
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของฮอกกี้ > ที่ป้องกันขาและคางของฮอกกี้: สนับเข่าโกลฮอกกี้; สนับขาโกลฮอกกี้; สนับแข้งผู้เล่นฮอกกี้; ปลอกและซับในสนับแข้ง
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Hockey Protective Gear > Hockey Shin Guards & Leg Pads: Hockey Goalie Knee Guards; Hockey Goalie Leg Pads; Hockey Player Shin Guards; Shin Guard Liners & Sleeves
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Equipo de protección de hockey > Almohadillas para piernas y protectores de barbilla para hockey: Protectores de rodilla para portero de hockey; Protectores de piernas para portero de hockey; Espinilleras de jugador de hockey; Forros y mangas para espinilleras
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Beskyttelsesutstyr for hockey > Legg- og benbeskyttere for hockey: Knebeskyttere for hockeykeepere; Beinbeskyttere for hockeykeepere; Leggbeskyttere for hockeyspillere; Fôringer og ermer for leggbeskyttere
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Đồ bảo vệ môn khúc côn cầu > Đệm chân và bảo vệ cẳng chân khúc côn cầu: Bó gối thủ môn khúc côn cầu; Đệm bảo vệ chân thủ môn khúc côn cầu; Bọc ống quyển người chơi khúc côn cầu; Lớp lót và băng bọc ống quyển
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 曲棍球護具 > 曲棍球護脛/護腿板: 曲棍球守門員護膝; 曲棍球守門員護腿墊; 曲棍球球員護脛; 護脛內襯與袖套
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Hockey-Schutzausrüstung > Hockey-Schienbeinschoner & -Beinschutz: Hockey-Torwart-Knieschützer; Hockey-Torwart-Beinschoner; Hockey-Schienbeinschützer für Feldspieler; Schienbeinschützer-Liner & Sleeves
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Ledo ritulio apsauginės priemonės > Ledo ritulio blauzdų apsaugos ir kojų pagalvėlės: Ledo ritulio vartininko kelių apsaugos; Ledo ritulio vartininko kojų apsaugos; Ledo ritulio žaidėjo blauzdų apsaugos; Blauzdų apsaugos įdėklai ir rankovės
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorong-védőfelszerelés > Jégkorong-lábszárvédők és -lábpárnák: Jégkorong kapus térdvédők; Jégkorong kapus lábvédők; Jégkorong játékos sípcsontvédők; Sípcsontvédő bélések és tartók
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Hokejové ochranné pomôcky > Hokejové chrániče holene a chrániče nôh: Chrániče kolien pre hokejových brankárov; Chrániče nôh pre hokejového brankára; Chrániče holení hokejistov; Vnútorné chrániče a návleky na holene
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰球护具 > 冰球护胫/护腿垫: 冰球守门员护膝; 冰球守门员护腿垫; 冰球球员护腿板; 护腿板内衬与护套
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Защитная экипировка для хоккея > Хоккейные щитки: Наколенники хоккейного вратаря; Щитки хоккейного вратаря; Щитки хоккейного полевого игрока; Подкладки и бандажи для хоккейных щитков
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Ochraniacze hokejowe > Hokejowe ochraniacze na nogi i golenie: Ochraniacze kolan dla bramkarzy hokejowych; Ochraniacze nóg dla bramkarzy hokejowych; Ochraniacze goleni dla graczy w hokeja; Wkładki i rękawy do ochraniaczy goleni
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Equipamento de proteção de hóquei > Caneleiras e joelheiras de hóquei: Joelheiras para goleiro de hóquei; Protetores de perna para goleiro de hóquei; Caneleiras para jogador de hóquei; Forros e mangas para caneleira
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Hokey Koruyucu Ekipmanları > Hokey Tekmelikleri ve Bacak Pedleri: Hokey kaleci dizlikleri; Hokey kaleci bacak korumaları; Hokey oyuncu tekmelikleri; Tekmelik astarları ve kılıfları
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Attrezzatura protettiva hockey > Ginocchiere e parastinchi da hockey: Ginocchiere da portiere di hockey; Gambali da portiere di hockey; Parastinchi per giocatori di hockey; Fodere e manicotti per parastinchi
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Zaščitna oprema za hokej > Hokejski ščitniki za goleni in ščitniki za noge: Ščitniki za kolena za hokejske vratarje; Ščitniki za noge za hokejske vratarje; Ščitniki za goleni igralcev hokeja; Ščitniki in rokavi za goleni
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Beschermende uitrusting voor ijshockey > Scheen- en beenbeschermers voor ijshockey: Kniebeschermers voor hockeykeepers; Beenpads voor hockeykeepers; Scheenbeschermers voor hockeyers; Voeringen en sleeves voor scheenbeschermers